Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2331
Underground natural gas transmission
line; representative present; excavation; duties.

Unless otherwise agreed by the operator and
excavator in writing, no excavation shall be performed within twenty-five
feet of an underground natural gas transmission line as defined in 49 C.F.R.
192.3 unless a representative of the operator of the underground natural gas
transmission line is present at the planned excavation area. If the representative
of the operator fails to appear at the proposed excavation area at the time
work is scheduled to commence, the excavator shall notify the operator that
the representative failed to appear and excavation operations can begin if
reasonable precautions are taken to protect the underground facility. This
section does not prohibit an operator from either voluntarily having its representative
present during excavation or from entering into an agreement voluntarily with
an excavator that allows an operator representative to be present during excavation.

Laws 2014, LB930, § 2.